apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
<pardef n="accept__vblex__sep">
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

</pardef>
</pardefs>

                            <e lm="turn off" i=""><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="fill up" i=""><i>fill</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="dress up" i=""><i>dress</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="knock down" i=""><i>knock</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="pull down" i=""><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="wall off" i=""><i>wall</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="wall in" i=""><i>wall</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="check out" i=""><i>check</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="pick up" i=""><i>pick</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="pull out" i=""><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="slow down" i=""><i>slow</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="turn off" i=""><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="fill up" i=""><i>fill</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="turn into" i=""><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="fill in" i=""><i>fill</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="foul up" i=""><i>foul</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="remand in custody" i=""><i>remand</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>custody</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>custody</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="remand on bail" i=""><i>remand</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>on<b/>bail</l><r><g><b/>on<b/>bail</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="churn up" i=""><i>churn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="coil up" i=""><i>coil</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="roll up" i=""><i>roll</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="depend on" i=""><i>depend</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="depend upon" i=""><i>depend</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>upon</l><r><g><b/>upon</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="buoy up" i=""><i>buoy</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
